California, session 20252026, AB491.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) California’s natural and working lands are essential to mitigating emissions and adapting to climate change. Restoring, maintaining, and conserving these as well-managed lands is a necessary complement to other direct emissions reductions. Climate-smart land management offers near-term, rapid, cost-effective, and large-scale opportunities for enduring reductions in emissions of carbon and other potent greenhouse gases, such as methane.(b) When lands are degraded, they release more greenhouse gases, increase climate risks to people and nature, and are more vulnerable to future climate change impacts. Lands stressed by climate change threaten food and water security, economic prosperity, and globally significant biodiversity.(c) In April 2024, the Natural Resources Agency established targets for natural carbon sequestration, and for nature-based climate solutions, as required by Section 38561.5 of the Health and Safety Code, in a document titled California’s Nature-Based Solutions Climate Targets. The targets establish annual goals for nonregulatory climate action across various land types for 2025 through 2045, inclusive.(d) Improving the health, function, and resilience of our natural and working landscapes will help reduce risks from wildfire, floods, and extreme weather events due to global warming that has already occurred.SEC. 2. Section 38561.5 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:38561.5. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Natural carbon sequestration” means actions that are undertaken on natural and working lands to remove and provide enduring storage of atmospheric greenhouse gases in vegetation and soils or to prevent emissions of greenhouse gases. soils. This shall include preservation, conservation, restoration, and sustainable management of these lands, which may include improved forest management, compost application, cover crops, hedgerows, planned grazing, urban forestry, riparian restoration, restoration of tidal flows to wetlands, and other forms of wetland restoration, among other relevant actions.(2) “Natural lands” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 9001.5 of the Public Resources Code.(3) “Nature-based climate solutions” means activities, such as restoration, conservation, and land management actions, that increase net carbon sequestration or reduce greenhouse gas emissions in natural and working lands.(4) “Vulnerable communities” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 71340 of the Public Resources Code.(5) “Working lands” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 9001.5 of the Public Resources Code.(b) (1) On or before January 1, 2024, the Natural Resources Agency, in collaboration with the state board, the California Environmental Protection Agency, the Department of Food and Agriculture, the expert advisory committee established pursuant to subdivision (c), and other relevant state agencies, shall determine an ambitious range of targets for natural carbon sequestration, and for nature-based climate solutions, that reduce greenhouse gas emissions for 2030, 2038, and 2045 to support state goals to achieve carbon neutrality and foster climate adaptation and resilience. These targets shall be integrated into the scoping plan prepared pursuant to Section 38561 and other state policies.(2) Projects and actions developed to achieve the targets established pursuant to paragraph (1) shall support the state’s efforts to achieve carbon neutrality, take into account climate impacts, increase resilience to climate change impacts, reduce greenhouse gas emissions, and enhance carbon sequestration in a manner that maximizes ecological health and biodiversity, and complements other climate and resources goals.(3) The state board shall ensure that all emissions reductions from projects and actions developed to achieve the targets established pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be accounted for in a manner that does not result in double counting of emissions reductions, and that all greenhouse gas emissions reductions and removals used for any market-based compliance mechanism are in addition to any reductions and removals that would otherwise occur.(4) On or before January 1, 2025, the Natural Resources Agency, in consultation with the state board, the California Environmental Protection Agency, and the Department of Food and Agriculture, shall review and update the Natural and Working Lands Climate Smart Strategy established pursuant to Section 39740.2 to achieve the targets established pursuant to paragraph (1).(5) The review and update pursuant to paragraph (4) shall include all of the following:(A) Descriptions of the actions and projects undertaken on natural and working lands to date.(B) Quantified progress on emissions reductions, natural carbon sequestration, and cobenefits.(C) A description of how the relevant agencies calculated emissions reductions, natural carbon sequestration, and cobenefits.(D) A summary of the benefits to low-income communities, disadvantaged communities, vulnerable communities, disadvantaged farmers, and Native American tribes.(E) An evaluation of the efficacy of the priority nature-based solutions, pathways, and priority actions for greenhouse gas reductions, climate resilience, and climate change adaptation.(F) Identification and description of any barriers to achieving the range of targets pursuant to paragraph (1).(G) Recommendations to address the barriers identified in subparagraph (F) to achieve the range of targets pursuant to paragraph (1).(H) Recommendations from the expert advisory committee established pursuant to subdivision (c).(6) It is the goal of the state to achieve each of the targets established by the Natural Resources Agency pursuant to paragraph (1) by the applicable date for the target, with priority given to activities that most rapidly, significantly, and cost effectively increase carbon stocks and net sequestration, protect and support ecosystem function, and reduce emissions of greenhouse gases.(c) The Natural Resources Agency and the state board shall jointly establish an expert advisory committee that is composed of university researchers, technical assistance providers, practitioners and other experts in the field of climate change and natural and working lands science and management, and Indigenous and environmental justice representatives, to inform and review modeling and analyses for natural and working lands, to advise state agencies on implementation strategies and standardized accounting, and to provide recommendations on addressing barriers to efficient implementation of this section.(d) No later than January 1, 2025, the state board shall develop standard methods for state agencies to consistently track greenhouse gas emissions and reductions, carbon sequestration, and, where feasible and in consultation with the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of Food and Agriculture, additional benefits from natural and working lands over time. In estimating and tracking greenhouse gas emissions and reductions and carbon sequestration from natural and working lands, the state board shall take into account, where feasible, both of the following:(1) Greenhouse gas emissions and reductions of carbon dioxide, methane, and nitrous oxide related to natural and working lands.(2) Potential impacts of climate change, including, but not limited to, increased fire risk, warming temperatures, and decreasing precipitation, on the ability to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and sequester carbon from natural and working lands.(e) On or before January 1, 2025, and every two years thereafter, the Natural Resources Agency shall publish data on its internet website on progress made in achieving the targets established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), including on state expenditures made to implement these targets.